Tennessee, session 114, SB0805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-107, is amended by deleting
"October 15" wherever it appears and substituting "October 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0805
000966
- 1 -